Wisconsin, session 2025, SB540.
do enact as follows:SB540,11Section 1. 103.135 of the statutes is created to read:SB540,2,52103.135 Compensation information of employees and prospective 3employees. (1) Unlawful employer conduct related to prospective 4employee compensation information. (a) No employer may directly or indirectly 5do any of the following:SB540,2,861. Subject to par. (b), solicit from a prospective employee or a prospective 7employee’s current or former employer information about the prospective 8employee’s current or prior compensation before making an offer of employment.SB540,2,1192. Require that a prospective employee’s current or prior compensation meet 10certain criteria in order for the prospective employee to be considered for 11employment.SB540,2,17123. Refuse to hire or employ or otherwise discriminate against a prospective 13employee in compensation or in the terms, conditions, or privileges of employment 14for opposing a practice prohibited under this paragraph, filing or indicating an 15intent to file a complaint or otherwise attempting to enforce any right under this 16paragraph, or testifying, assisting, or participating in any manner in any 17investigation, action, or proceeding to enforce any right under this paragraph.SB540,3,2184. Subject to par. (b), notwithstanding the provisions of subch. II of ch. 230 19regarding state civil service, rely on information obtained from any source 20regarding a prospective employee’s current or prior compensation when 1determining whether to make an offer of employment or setting compensation when 2making an offer of employment to that prospective employee.SB540,3,73(b) After an employer has offered employment to a prospective employee and 4the details of compensation have been agreed upon, the employer may obtain the 5prospective employee’s written consent for the employer to solicit information 6about, or take action to confirm, the prospective employee’s current or prior 7compensation.SB540,3,128(2) Disclosure of compensation information by employees. (a) An 9employee may disclose the details of the employee’s compensation to anyone and, 10subject to par. (d), may discuss the compensation of other employees of the same 11employer and may ask other employees of the same employer for details regarding 12their compensation.SB540,3,1513(b) Except as provided in par. (d), no employer may interfere with, restrain, or 14deny the exercise of the right of an employee to disclose, discuss, or inquire about 15compensation as provided in par. (a).SB540,3,2216(c) An employer may not discharge or discriminate against an employee in 17promotion, in compensation, or in the terms, conditions, or privileges of 18employment for disclosing, discussing, or inquiring about compensation as provided 19in par. (a), opposing a practice prohibited under par. (b), filing or indicating an 20intent to file a complaint or otherwise attempting to enforce any right under par. 21(a), or testifying, assisting, or participating in any manner in any investigation, 22action, or proceeding to enforce any right under par. (a).SB540,4,423(d) Subject to s. 19.35, an employer may prohibit a human resources or payroll 1employee, a supervisor, or any other employee whose job responsibilities require or 2allow the employee access to other employees’ compensation information from 3disclosing information about any other employee’s compensation without that 4employee’s prior written consent.SB540,4,75(3) Enforcement. Any employee or prospective employee who is refused 6employment, terminated, discharged, or otherwise discriminated against in 7violation of sub. (1) (a) or (2) (a) to (c) may do any of the following:SB540,4,158(a) File a complaint with the department, and the department shall process 9the complaint in the same manner that employment discrimination complaints are 10processed under s. 111.39. If the department finds that a violation has occurred, 11the department may order the employer to take action to remedy the violation, 12including reinstating the employee, providing compensation in lieu of 13reinstatement, providing back pay accrued not more than 2 years before the 14complaint was filed, and paying reasonable actual costs and, notwithstanding s. 15814.04 (1), reasonable attorney fees to the complainant.SB540,4,1616(b) Bring an action in circuit court under sub. (4).SB540,4,2017(4) Civil action. (a) The department or an individual alleged or found to 18have been discriminated against under sub. (1) or (2) may bring an action in circuit 19court requesting the relief described in par. (d) against an employer that is alleged 20or found to have engaged in that discrimination.SB540,5,221(b) If a petition for judicial review of the findings and order of the department 22concerning the same violation as the violation giving rise to the action under par. 1(a) is filed, the circuit court shall consolidate the proceeding for judicial review and 2the action under par. (a).SB540,5,63(c) An individual alleged or found to have been discriminated against under 4sub. (1) or (2) is not required to file a complaint under sub. (3) (a) or seek review 5under s. 111.395 in order for the department or the individual to bring an action 6under par. (a).SB540,5,217(d) Subject to pars. (e) and (f), in an action under par. (a), if the circuit court 8finds that discrimination has occurred, or if such a finding has been made by an 9examiner and not been further appealed, the circuit court may order any relief that 10an examiner would be empowered to order under s. 111.39 (4) (c) after a hearing on 11a complaint filed under s. 111.39. In addition, the circuit court shall order the 12defendant to pay to the individual discriminated against any other compensatory 13damages and punitive damages under s. 895.043 that the circuit court or jury finds 14appropriate, plus reasonable costs and attorney fees incurred in the action. If any 15relief was ordered under sub. (3) (a) or s. 111.395, the circuit court shall specify 16whether the relief ordered under this paragraph is in addition to or replaces the 17relief ordered under sub. (3) (a) or s. 111.395. The sum of the amount of 18compensatory damages for future economic losses and for pain and suffering, 19emotional distress, mental anguish, loss of enjoyment of life, and other noneconomic 20losses and the amount of punitive damages that a circuit court may order may not 21exceed the following:SB540,6,2221. In the case of a defendant that employs 100 or fewer employees for each 1working day in each of 20 or more calendar weeks in the current or preceding year, 2$50,000.SB540,6,532. In the case of a defendant that employs more than 100 but fewer than 201 4employees for each working day in each of 20 or more calendar weeks in the current 5or preceding year, $100,000.SB540,6,863. In the case of a defendant that employs more than 200 but fewer than 501 7employees for each working day in each of 20 or more calendar weeks in the current 8or preceding year, $200,000.SB540,6,1194. In the case of a defendant that employs more than 500 employees for each 10working day in each of 20 or more calendar weeks in the current or preceding year, 11$300,000.SB540,6,1412(e) If the circuit court orders a payment under par. (d) because of a violation of 13sub. (1) or (2) by an individual employed by an employer, the employer of that 14individual is liable for the payment.SB540,6,1715(f) 1. In this paragraph, “consumer price index” means the average of the 16consumer price index for all urban consumers, U.S. city average, as determined by 17the bureau of labor statistics of the federal department of labor.SB540,7,7182. Except as otherwise provided in this subdivision, beginning on July 1, 2026, 19and on each July 1 after that, the department shall adjust the amounts specified in 20par. (d) 1., 2., 3., and 4. by calculating the percentage difference between the 21consumer price index for the 12-month period ending on December 31 of the 22preceding year and the consumer price index for the 12-month period ending on 23December 31 of the year before the preceding year and adjusting those amounts by 1that percentage difference. The department shall publish the adjusted amounts 2calculated under this subdivision in the Wisconsin Administrative Register, and the 3adjusted amounts shall apply to actions commenced under par. (a) beginning on 4July 1 of the year of publication. This subdivision does not apply if the consumer 5price index for the 12-month period ending on December 31 of the preceding year 6did not increase over the consumer price index for the 12-month period ending on 7December 31 of the year before the preceding year.SB540,7,98(5) Notice posted. (a) Each employer shall provide notice to employees and 9prospective employees of their rights under this section by doing all of the following:SB540,7,12101. Posting, in one or more conspicuous places where notices to employees are 11customarily posted, a notice in a form approved by the department setting forth 12employees’ and prospective employees’ rights under this section.SB540,7,15132. Including on each listing for a job vacancy or other employment opportunity 14that is advertised by email and posting on a website, or other electronic means, a 15notice that includes all of the following information:SB540,7,1916a. A statement that the employer is prohibited from relying on a prospective 17employee’s current or former compensation when determining whether to make an 18offer of employment or setting compensation or when making an offer of 19employment.SB540,7,2320b. A statement that the employer is prohibited from asking about a 21prospective employee’s current or former compensation until after the employer has 22offered the prospective employee employment and they have agreed upon the details 23of compensation. Down Down /2025/related/proposals/sb540 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/sb540 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB540 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB540 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»SB540: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting